District of Columbia statutes.
10-1202.44

Internship program.

The operator of the new convention center hotel, the Hospitality High School of Washington, D.C., and the District of Columbia Hotel Association shall create an internship program for the Hospitality High School of Washington, D.C., students at the new convention center hotel.

Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-188, § 904
as added Oct. 22, 2009, D.C. Law 18-78,§ 2(i), 56 DCR 6959
redesignated as § 244, Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 73(b)(5), 59 DCR 6190
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 redesignated D.C. Law 10-188, § 904 as D.C. Law 10-188, § 244.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(i) of New Convention Center Hotel Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-186, August 12, 2009, 56 DCR 6967).